Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-326
Chief of police; powers and duties.

The chief of police of a city of the primary class shall have the immediate charge of the police, and he or she and his or her officers shall have the power and duty to arrest all offenders against the laws of the state or the ordinances of the city in the same manner as the county sheriff and to keep such offenders in the city jail or other place to prevent their escape until a trial or examination may be had before a proper officer. The jurisdiction of the chief of police and his or her officers in the service of process, in all criminal cases, and in cases for the violation of city ordinances shall be coextensive with the county.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 40, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 4503;

C.S.1922, § 3889;

C.S.1929, § 15-326;

R.S.1943, § 15-326;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 100;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 390, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 96.

Ticket quota requirements, prohibited, see section 48-235.